Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-614
Sale of crypts or niches; amount set aside for maintenance.

Any person, partnership, limited liability company, firm, corporation, or association which sells, assigns, or transfers any crypt or niche in a mausoleum or columbarium shall set aside a sum of not less than fifty dollars for each crypt and not less than twenty-five dollars for each niche or ten percent of the sale price of each crypt or niche whichever sum is the greater. In the event that sales of crypts, rooms, or niches shall be made upon a partial payment plan there shall be set apart and applied to the maintenance fund from each such payment such proportion thereof as the number of partial payments bears to the total amount of the sum required to be set aside for such fund.

Laws 1957, c. 18, § 9, p. 148;

Laws 1969, c. 55, § 4, p. 357;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 125.